North Dakota, session 69, SB2278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - RETENTION OF LIBRARY MATERIALS.
During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the feasibility and
desirability of requiring libraries maintained by state agencies, including the state library and libraries at
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, to retain a copy of any book or
other written material that contains the material's original text if the publisher of the material publishes a
new version to update language that was common when the material was originally published to
language that is considered more socially progressive, politically correct, inclusive, or less socially
offensive. The study must include an analysis of how artificial intelligence has or will affect the retention
of library materials, how library materials are updated or altered using artificial intelligence, and the
fiscal and operational impact of collection management. The legislative management shall report its
findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2278 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2278.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 77 Nays 14 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State